Illinois, session 104th, HB1710.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Criminal Justice Information Act 5is amended by adding Section 16 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3930/16 new)7    Sec. 16. Homicide reporting.8    (a) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Authority shall study and 9compile and, by September 1, 2026 and every 4 months 10thereafter, publish on the Authority's public website, in a 11form determined by the Authority, the information submitted by 12the Illinois State Police under Section 5-10 of the Uniform 13Crime Reporting Act. 14    (b) The Authority shall publish the following information 15for each relevant law enforcement agency:16        (1) the number of homicides;17        (2) the number of aggravated assaults with a firearm;18        (3) the number of aggravated assaults with a firearm 19    and homicides for which an alleged perpetrator has been 20    cleared by arrest;21        (4) the number of aggravated assaults with a firearm 22    and homicides that are considered clear or closed for a 23    reason other than an arrest; and  HB1710 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08432 SPS 18484 b1        (5) the number of cases described in paragraph (4) 2    that were cleared or closed because:3            (i) the alleged perpetrator is deceased;4            (ii) the case was declined by prosecution;5            (iii) the suspect is in custody of another 6        jurisdiction; or7            (iv) there are other exceptional means outside of 8        law enforcement's control. 9    Section 10. The Uniform Crime Reporting Act is amended by 10changing Sections 5-10 as follows: 11    (50 ILCS 709/5-10)12    Sec. 5-10. Central repository of crime statistics. 13    (a) The Illinois State Police shall be a central 14repository and custodian of crime statistics for the State and 15shall have all the power necessary to carry out the purposes of 16this Act, including the power to demand and receive 17cooperation in the submission of crime statistics from all law 18enforcement agencies. All data and information provided to the 19Illinois State Police under this Act must be provided in a 20manner and form prescribed by the Illinois State Police. On an 21annual basis, the Illinois State Police shall make available 22compilations of crime statistics and monthly reporting 23required to be reported by each law enforcement agency. 24    (b) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Illinois State Police   HB1710 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08432 SPS 18484 b1shall submit to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 2Authority, or provide to the Authority through web-based 3access, the information the Illinois Criminal Justice 4Information Authority is required to publish under subsection 5(b) of Section 16 of the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 6Act and that the Illinois State Police has collected from law 7enforcement agencies. 8(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 9102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)